Texas, session 892, HB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Effective January 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60055, 24.60056, and 24.60057 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60055.  513TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 513th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. Sec. 24.60056.  514TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 514th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. Sec. 24.60057.  515TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 515th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. SECTION 2.  Effective October 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60058 and 24.60059 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60058.  516TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 516th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. Sec. 24.60059.  517TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 517th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. SECTION 3.  (a)  The 513th, 514th, and 515th Judicial Districts are created on January 1, 2026. (b)  The 516th and 517th Judicial Districts are created on October 1, 2026. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.